District of Columbia statutes.
47-2887.13

Prohibited conduct.

(a)

An athlete agent, with the intent to induce a student-athlete to enter into an agency contract, may not:

(1)

Give any materially false or misleading information or make a materially false promise or representation;

(2)

Furnish anything of value to a student-athlete before the student-athlete enters into the agency contract; or

(3)

Furnish anything of value to any individual other than the student-athlete or another registered athlete agent.

(b)

An athlete agent may not intentionally:

(1)

Initiate contact with a student-athlete unless registered under this part;

(2)

Refuse or fail to retain or permit inspection of the records required to be retained by § 47-2887.12;

(3)

Fail to register when required by § 47-2887.03;

(4)

Provide materially false or misleading information in an application for registration or renewal of registration;

(5)

Predate or postdate an agency contract; or

(6)

Fail to notify a student-athlete before the student-athlete signs or otherwise authenticates an agency contract for a particular sport that the signing or authentication may make the student-athlete ineligible to participate as a student-athlete in that sport.

Apr. 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-107, § 3, 49 DCR 1193)
This section is referenced in § 47-2887.05 and § 47-2887.14.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 14 of the Uniform Athlete Agents Act.